Illinois, session 104th, SB3727.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Mental Health and Developmental 5Disabilities Administrative Act is amended by changing Section 674 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 1705/74)8    Sec. 74. Rates and reimbursements. 9    (a) Within 30 days after July 6, 2017 (the effective date 10of Public Act 100-23), the Department shall increase rates and 11reimbursements to fund a minimum of a $0.75 per hour wage 12increase for frontline personnel, including, but not limited 13to, direct support professionals, aides, frontline 14supervisors, qualified intellectual disabilities 15professionals, nurses, and non-administrative support staff 16working in community-based provider organizations serving 17individuals with developmental disabilities. The Department 18shall adopt rules, including emergency rules under subsection 19(y) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 20Act, to implement the provisions of this Section.21    (b) Rates and reimbursements. Within 30 days after June 4, 222018 (the effective date of Public Act 100-587), the 23Department shall increase rates and reimbursements to fund a   SB3727- 2 -LRB104 19958 KTG 33408 b1minimum of a $0.50 per hour wage increase for frontline 2personnel, including, but not limited to, direct support 3professionals, aides, frontline supervisors, qualified 4intellectual disabilities professionals, nurses, and 5non-administrative support staff working in community-based 6provider organizations serving individuals with developmental 7disabilities. The Department shall adopt rules, including 8emergency rules under subsection (bb) of Section 5-45 of the 9Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 10provisions of this Section.11    (c) Rates and reimbursements. Within 30 days after June 5, 122019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-10), subject to 13federal approval, the Department shall increase rates and 14reimbursements in effect on June 30, 2019 for community-based 15providers for persons with Developmental Disabilities by 3.5% 16The Department shall adopt rules, including emergency rules 17under subsection (jj) of Section 5-45 of the Illinois 18Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the provisions of 19this Section, including wage increases for direct care staff.20    (d) For community-based providers serving persons with 21intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 22approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 23effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2022, 24shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 25to provide a $1.50 per hour wage increase for direct support 26professionals in residential settings and sufficient to   SB3727- 3 -LRB104 19958 KTG 33408 b1provide wages for all residential non-executive direct care 2staff, excluding direct support professionals, at the federal 3Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 4as defined in rule by the Department.5    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 6methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 7with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 8federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 9defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 10rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 11of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 12provisions of this subsection (d). 13    (e) For community-based providers serving persons with 14intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 15approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 16effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2023, 17shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 18to provide a $1.00 per hour wage increase for all direct 19support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 20are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 21wage increases, who work in residential and community day 22services settings, with at least $0.50 of those funds to be 23provided as a direct increase to base wages, with the 24remaining $0.50 to be used flexibly for base wage increases. 25In addition, the rates taking effect for services delivered on 26or after January 1, 2023 shall include an increase sufficient   SB3727- 4 -LRB104 19958 KTG 33408 b1to provide wages for all residential non-executive direct care 2staff, excluding direct support professionals, at the federal 3Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 4as defined in rule by the Department.5    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 6methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 7with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 8federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 9defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 10rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 11of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 12provisions of this subsection. 13    (f) For community-based providers serving persons with 14intellectual/developmental disabilities, subject to federal 15approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 16effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2024 17shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 18to provide a $2.50 per hour wage increase for all direct 19support professionals and all other frontline personnel who 20are not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average 21wage increases and who work in residential and community day 22services settings. At least $1.25 of the per hour wage 23increase shall be provided as a direct increase to base wages, 24and the remaining $1.25 of the per hour wage increase shall be 25used flexibly for base wage increases. In addition, the rates 26taking effect for services delivered on or after January 1,   SB3727- 5 -LRB104 19958 KTG 33408 b12024 shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for 2all residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding 3direct support professionals, at the federal Department of 4Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined in 5rule by the Department. 6    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 7methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 8with intellectual/developmental disabilities are subject to 9federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 10defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 11rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 12of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 13provisions of this subsection. 14    (g) For community-based providers serving persons with 15intellectual or developmental disabilities, subject to federal 16approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 17effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2025 18shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 19to provide a $1 per hour wage rate increase for all direct 20support personnel and all other frontline personnel who are 21not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage 22increases and who work in residential and community day 23services settings, with at least $0.75 of those funds to be 24provided as a direct increase to base wages and the remaining 25$0.25 to be used flexibly for base wage increases. These 26increases shall not be used by community-based providers for   SB3727- 6 -LRB104 19958 KTG 33408 b1operational or administrative expenses. In addition, the rates 2taking effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 32025 shall include an increase sufficient to provide wages for 4all residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding 5direct support personnel, at the federal Department of Labor, 6Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined by rule by 7the Department. For services delivered on or after January 1, 82025, the rates shall include adjustments to 9employment-related expenses as defined by rule by the 10Department. 11    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 12methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 13with intellectual or developmental disabilities are subject to 14federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 15defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 16rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 17of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 18provisions of this subsection. 19    (h) For community-based providers serving persons with 20intellectual or developmental disabilities, subject to federal 21approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment, the rates taking 22effect for services delivered on or after January 1, 2026 23shall include an increase in the rate methodology sufficient 24to provide a $0.80 per hour wage increase for all direct 25support personnel and all other frontline personnel who are 26not subject to the Bureau of Labor Statistics' average wage   SB3727- 7 -LRB104 19958 KTG 33408 b1increases and who work in residential and community day 2services settings, with at least $0.60 of the per hour wage 3increase to be provided as a direct increase to base wages, and 4the remaining $0.20 of the per hour wage increase to be used 5flexibly for base wage increases. These increases shall not be 6used by community-based providers for operational or 7administrative expenses. In addition, the rates taking effect 8for services delivered on or after January 1, 2026 shall 9include an increase sufficient to provide wages for all 10residential non-executive direct care staff, excluding direct 11support personnel, at the federal Department of Labor, Bureau 12of Labor Statistics' average wage as defined in rule by the 13Department. 14    The establishment of and any changes to the rate 15methodologies for community-based services provided to persons 16with intellectual or developmental disabilities are subject to 17federal approval of any relevant Waiver Amendment and shall be 18defined in rule by the Department. The Department shall adopt 19rules, including emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 20of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, to implement the 21provisions of this subsection. 22    (i) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department shall reissue 23the original cost and wage survey for costs associated with 24the administration of services to persons with intellectual 25and developmental disabilities in community day services that 26was contained in the Department's Guidehouse Rate Study. The   SB3727- 8 -LRB104 19958 KTG 33408 b1cost and wage survey shall be used to effectuate rate 2increases in transportation funding for the administration of 3community day services to persons with intellectual and 4developmental disabilities and may include the following 5items: 6        (1) Provider contact information.7        (2) Total costs of employee salaries and benefits.8        (3) Category of services provided by agencies.9        (4) Salary and wage information for staff.10        (5) Benefits for staff.11        (6) Staff turnover.12        (7) Day services costs.13        (8) Supported employment costs.14        (9) Costs related to the provision of transportation.15    The Department shall adopt rules to implement this 16subsection. 17(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 18103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 104-2, eff. 6-16-25.) 19    Section 10. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 20adding Section 5-5a.2 as follows: 21    (305 ILCS 5/5-5a.2 new)22    Sec. 5-5a.2. Community day services billing; adults with 23intellectual and developmental disabilities. The Department 24shall file an amendment to the Home and Community-Based   SB3727- 9 -LRB104 19958 KTG 33408 b1Services Waiver Program for Adults with Developmental 2Disabilities authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social 3Security Act that removes the 5 hour per day billing maximums 4for community day services. The amendment shall not modify 5monthly and yearly billing maximums for community day 6services. Implementation of this Section is contingent on 7federal approval. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.